California statutes. Unemployment Insurance Code
 has established to the satisfaction of the director that there is a lack of automation, a severe economic hardship, a current exemption from filing electronically for federal purposes, or other good cause. An approved waiver shall be valid for one year or longer, at the discretion of the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 222, Sec. 1.   (AB 1245)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1088.5.

(a) In addition to information reported in accordance with Section 1088, effective July 1, 1998, each employer shall file, with the department, the information provided for in subdivision (b) on new employees.

(b) Each employer shall report the hiring of any employee who works in this state and to whom the employer anticipates paying
 wages, and also shall report the hiring of any employee who previously worked for the employer but had been separated from that prior employment for at least 60 consecutive days.

(c) (1) This section shall not apply to any department, agency, or instrumentality of the United States.

(2) State agency employers shall not be required to report employees performing intelligence or counterintelligence functions, if the head of the agency has determined that reporting pursuant to this section would endanger the safety of the employee or compromise an ongoing investigation or intelligence mission.

(d) (1) Employers shall submit a report as described in paragraph (4) within 20 days of hiring any employee whom the employer is required to report pursuant to this section.

(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), employers transmitting reports magnetically or electronically shall submit the report by two monthly transmissions not less than 12 days and not more than 16 days apart.

(3) For purposes of this section, an employer that has employees in two or more states and that transmits reports magnetically or electronically may designate one state in which the employer has employees to which the employer will transmit the report described in paragraph (4). Any employer that transmits reports pursuant to this paragraph shall notify the Secretary of Health and Human Services in writing as to which state the employer designates for the purpose of sending reports.

(4) The report shall contain the following:

(A) The name, address, and
 social security number of the employees.

(B) The employer’s name, address, state employer identification number (if one has been issued), and identifying number assigned to the employer under Section 6109 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.

(C) The first date the employee worked.

(5) Employers may report pursuant to this section by submitting a copy of the employee’s W-4 form, a form provided by the department, or any other hiring document transmitted by first-class mail, magnetically, or electronically.

(e) For each failure to report the hiring of an employee, as required and within the time required by this section, unless the failure is due to good cause, the department may assess a penalty of twenty-four dollars ($24), or four hundred ninety
 dollars ($490) if the failure is the result of conspiracy between the employer and employee not to supply the required report or to supply a false or incomplete report.

(f) (1) On and after January 1, 2013, and before January 1, 2019, information collected pursuant to this section may be used for the following purposes:

(A) Administration of this code, including, but not limited to, providing employer or employee information to participating members of the Joint Enforcement Strike Force on the Underground Economy pursuant to Section 329 for the purposes of auditing, investigating, and prosecuting violations of tax and cash-pay reporting laws.

(B) Locating individuals for purposes of establishing paternity and establishing, modifying, and enforcing child support obligations.

(C) Administration of employment security and workers’ compensation programs.

(D) Providing employer or employee information to the Franchise Tax Board and the State Board of Equalization for the purpose of tax or fee enforcement.

(E) Verification of eligibility of applicants for, or recipients of, the public assistance programs listed in Section 1320b-7(b) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(F) Providing employer or employee information to the Contractors’ State License Board and the State Compensation Insurance Fund for the purpose of workers’ compensation payroll reporting.

(G) Providing employer or employee information to the State Department of Health Care Services, the California
 Health Benefit Exchange, the Managed Risk Medical Insurance Board, and county departments and agencies for the purpose of:

(i) Verifying or determining the eligibility of an applicant for, or a recipient of, state health subsidy programs, limited to the Medi-Cal program, provided pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the Healthy Families Program, provided pursuant to Part 6.2 (commencing with Section 12693) of Division 2 of the Insurance Code, and the Access for Infants and Mothers Program, provided pursuant to Part 6.3 (commencing with Section 12695) of Division 2 of the Insurance Code, where the verification or determination is directly connected with, and limited to, the administration of the state health subsidy programs referenced in this clause.

(ii) Verifying or determining the eligibility of an
 applicant for, or a recipient of, federal subsidies offered through the California Health Benefit Exchange, provided pursuant to Title 22 (commencing with Section 100500) of the Government Code, including federal tax credits and cost-sharing assistance pursuant to the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, (Public Law 111-148), as amended by the federal Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152), where the verification or determination is directly connected with, and limited to, the administration of the California Health Benefit Exchange.

(iii) Verifying or determining the eligibility of employees and employers for health coverage through the Small Business Health Options Program, provided pursuant to Section 100502 of the Government Code, where the verification or determination is directly connected with, and limited to, the administration of the Small Business Health Options Program.

(2) On and after January 1, 2019, information collected pursuant to this section may be used for the following purposes:

(A) Administration of this code.

(B) Locating individuals for purposes of establishing paternity and establishing, modifying, and enforcing child support obligations.

(C) Administration of employment security and workers’ compensation programs.

(D) Providing employer or employee information to the Franchise Tax Board and to the State Board of Equalization for the purposes of tax or fee enforcement.

(E) Verification of eligibility of applicants for, or recipients of, the public assistance programs listed in
 Section 1320b-7(b) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(F) Providing employer or employee information to the State Department of Health Care Services, the California Health Benefit Exchange, the Managed Risk Medical Insurance Board, and county departments and agencies for the purpose of:

(i) Verifying or determining the eligibility of an applicant for, or a recipient of, state health subsidy programs, limited to the Medi-Cal program, provided pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the Healthy Families Program, provided pursuant to Part 6.2 (commencing with Section 12693) of Division 2 of the Insurance Code, and the Access for Infants and Mothers Program, provided pursuant to Part 6.3 (commencing with Section 12695) of Division 2 of the Insurance Code, where the verification or determination is directly
 connected with, and limited to, the administration of the state health subsidy programs referenced in this clause.

(ii) Verifying or determining the eligibility of an applicant for, or a recipient of, federal subsidies offered through the California Health Benefit Exchange, provided pursuant to Title 22 (commencing with Section 100500) of the Government Code, including federal tax credits and cost-sharing assistance pursuant to the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, (Public Law 111-148), as amended by the federal Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152), where the verification or determination is directly connected with, and limited to, the administration of the California Health Benefit Exchange.

(iii) Verifying or determining the eligibility of employees and employers for health coverage through the Small Business Health Options
 Program, provided pursuant to Section 100502 of the Government Code, where the verification or determination is directly connected with, and limited to, the administration of the Small Business Health Options Program.

(g) For purposes of this section, “employer” includes a labor union hiring hall.

(h) This section shall become operative on July 1, 1998.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 815, Sec. 3.3.   (AB 174)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1088.6.

Each employer, pursuant to authorized regulations, shall furnish a written statement to the worker showing the excess of the worker contributions required with respect to wages included in Section 927 and subdivision (n) of Section 13009 over the worker contributions withheld pursuant to Sections 984 and 13020, and shall file a copy of this statement with the director. If the employer fails to furnish the statement, as required by this section and authorized regulations, he or she shall be liable for the excess of the worker contributions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 402, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1088.8.

(a) Effective January 1, 2001, any service-recipient, as defined in subdivision (b), who makes or is required to make a return to the Internal Revenue Service, in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 6041A of the Internal Revenue Code (relating to payments made to a service-provider as compensation for services) shall file with the department information as required under subdivision (c).

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Service-recipient” means any individual, person, corporation, association, or partnership, or agent thereof, doing business in this state, deriving trade or business income from sources within this state, or in any manner in the course of a trade or business subject to the laws of this state. “Service-recipient” also includes the State of California or any political subdivision thereof, including the Regents of the University of California, any charter city, or any political body not a subdivision or agency of the state, and any person, employee, department, or agent thereof.

(2) “Service-provider” means an individual who is not an employee of the service-recipient for California purposes and who received compensation or executes a contract for services performed for that service-recipient within or without the state.

(c) Each service-recipient shall report all of the following information to the department, within 20 days of the earlier of first making payments that in the aggregate equal or exceed six hundred dollars ($600) in any year to a service-provider, or entering into a contract or contracts with a service-provider providing for payments that in the aggregate equal or exceed six hundred dollars ($600) in any year:

(1) The full name, address, and social security number of the service-provider.

(2) The service-recipient’s name, business name, address, and telephone number.

(3) The service-recipient’s federal employer identification number, California state employer account number, social security number, or other identifying number as required by the Employment Development Department in consultation with the
 Franchise Tax Board.

(4) The date the contract is executed, or if no contract, the date payments in the aggregate first equal or exceed six hundred dollars ($600).

(5) The total dollar amount of the contract, if any, and the contract expiration date.

(d) The department shall retain information collected pursuant to this section until November 1 following the tax year in which the contract is executed, or if no contract, the tax year in which the aggregate payments first equal or exceed six hundred dollars ($600).

(e) For each failure to fully comply with subdivision (c), unless the failure is due to good cause, the department may assess a penalty of twenty-four dollars ($24), or four hundred ninety dollars ($490) if the failure is the result of
 conspiracy between the service recipient and service provider not to supply the required report or to supply a false or incomplete report.

(f) Information obtained by the department pursuant to this section may be released only for purposes of establishing, modifying, or enforcing child support obligations under Section 17400 of the Family Code and for child support collection purposes authorized under Article 5 (commencing with Section 19271) of Chapter 5 of Part 10.2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, or to the Franchise Tax Board for tax enforcement purposes or for the administration of this code.

(g) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2001.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 808, Sec. 115.   Effective September 28, 2000.   Section initially operative January 1, 2001, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1088.9.

(a) Commencing with the first calendar quarter of calendar year 2026, a motion picture payroll services company shall file with the director, within the same time required by subdivision (a) of Section 1110 for payment of employer contributions, a report of payments made to a loan-out company pursuant to subdivision (b).

(b) The report shall include all of the following information:

(1) The total amount of payments made to the loan-out company.

(2) The business name, address, and telephone number of the loan-out company.

(3) The federal employer
 identification number, California employer account number, or other identifying number of the loan-out corporation, as required by the Employment Development Department, in consultation with the Franchise Tax Board.

(4) The full name, address, and social security number of any individual whose services were provided through the loan-out company.

(5) The name, address, and federal employer identification number, California employer account number, or other identifying number of the motion picture payroll services company, as required by the Employment Development Department, in consultation with the Franchise Tax Board.

(6) Any other information as the director shall prescribe.

(c) The Franchise Tax Board may access the information filed with the
 department pursuant to this section.

(d) A lack of access to the information required to be reported under this section does not relieve any obligation on a motion picture payroll services company to continue to timely pay a loan-out company all payments due.

(e) (1) For each failure to fully comply with subdivisions (a), (b), and (d), unless the failure is due to good cause, the department may assess a penalty of twenty-four dollars ($24), or, if the failure is willful or fraudulent, the department may assess a penalty of four hundred ninety dollars ($490).

(2) A failure to fully comply with subdivisions (a) and (b) shall be deemed to be for good cause pursuant to paragraph (1) if a motion picture payroll services company has requested that a loan-out company provide information required by
 subdivision (b) and the loan-out company does not provide the requested information, or provides incorrect or incomplete information.

(f) For purposes of this section, the definitions in Section 679 shall apply, as applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 1011, Sec. 3.   (SB 422)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1089.

(a) Each employer shall post and maintain, in places readily accessible to individuals in the employer’s service, printed statements concerning benefit rights and other matters as may be prescribed by authorized regulations.

(b) Each employer shall, pursuant to authorized regulations, supply each individual at the time they become unemployed with copies of printed statements or materials relating to claims for benefits, or if the individual opts into receipt of electronic
 statements or materials, electronic statements or materials relating to claims for benefits.

(c) Each employer shall immediately notify each employee of any change in the employee’s relationship with that employer.

(d) Printed statements shall be supplied by the director to each employer without cost to them.

(e) (1) The employer may provide the notification required by subdivision (a) or (b) via email to an email account of the employee’s choosing in PDF, JPEG, or other digital image file type format, if an employee affirmatively, and in
 writing, by email,
 or by some form of electronic acknowledgment, opts into receipt of electronic statements or materials.

(2) (A) In the case of electronic acknowledgment, the acknowledgment form shall do all of the following:

(i) Fully explain that the employee is agreeing to electronic delivery of the notification required by this section.

(ii) Provide the employee with information about how they can revoke consent to electronic receipt.

(iii) Create a record of the employee’s agreement to electronic delivery of the
 notification required by this section.

(B) The employee may revoke the agreement at any time in writing, by email, or by some form of electronic acknowledgment.

(f) An employer may not discharge an employee or in any manner discriminate, retaliate, or take any adverse action against an employee who does not affirmatively, in writing or by electronic acknowledgment, opt into receipt of electronic statements or materials.

(g) Failure to comply with this section by an employer shall constitute a misdemeanor.

(h) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   (AB 1355)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 4 of Stats. 2023, Ch. 277.)
-------------------------------------------

1089.

(a) Each employer shall post and maintain in places readily accessible to individuals in their service such printed statements concerning benefit rights and other matters as may be prescribed by authorized regulations. Each employer shall, pursuant to authorized regulations, supply each individual at the time they become unemployed with copies of printed statements or materials relating to claims for benefits. Each employer shall immediately notify each employee of any change in their relationship with the employer. Failure to comply with this section by an employer shall constitute a misdemeanor. Such printed statements shall be supplied by the director to each employer without cost to them. 

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2029.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 3) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 277, Sec. 4.   (AB 1355)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1090.

(a) Every assignee, receiver, trustee in bankruptcy, or other representative of an insolvent employing unit, and every administrator or executor of the estate of a deceased employing unit, shall within 30 days after assuming office send notice in writing of the name and address of the employing unit, his own name and address, and such other information as may be required by the director.

(b) Within four months after the mailing of the notice required of every administrator or executor of the estate of a deceased employing unit under subdivision (a), the director shall file or present his
 claim for contributions, penalty, and interest based upon wages paid by the employing unit during his lifetime. The administrator or executor of the estate of a deceased employing unit shall succeed to all the rights and obligations of the deceased employing unit under this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1299.)
-------------------------------------------

1092.

Every employing unit shall furnish to the director, administrative law judge, or deputy, upon demand, a sworn statement of the matters contained in the records required by Section 1085. If such records are kept pursuant to contract with a financial institution as defined in Section 7465 of the Government Code, the employing unit shall also furnish to the director or the director’s authorized representative an authorization for disclosure of such account or accounts. The authorization for disclosure shall be that provided for in Section 7473 of the Government Code. Such records shall be open to inspection and shall be subject to being copied by the
 director or his authorized representative at any time during the business hours of the employing unit. Any claimant or his authorized representative at a hearing before a deputy or administrative law judge or the appeals board shall be supplied with information from such records to the extent necessary for the proper presentation of his claim.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 537, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

1093.

In the event any employer shall fail to keep and furnish to the director, upon notice, any required records or reports necessary for a full determination, decision on appeal, or other proper disposition of any claim for benefits in any proceeding under this division, within such reasonable time as the director may by rule, regulation, or procedure prescribe, it shall be conclusively presumed that the claimant is entitled to the maximum total amount of benefits payable under this division unless it is established by other evidence which the director deems sufficient that a lesser total amount of benefits is properly due and owing to the claimant. If so established by other
 evidence upon default of the employer, after notice, such lesser total amount of benefits thus determined shall be conclusive. In all cases in which such presumptions shall apply, if the claimant has earned wages in employment for more than one employer during his base period, the accounts of the employer or employers who have properly kept and furnished the required records or reports shall not be charged with benefits in an amount exceeding that which such accounts would have been charged had the claimant been entitled only to benefits determined by the total of the wages earned and the number of calendar quarters worked for them and all benefits paid in excess thereof shall be charged solely against the accounts of the employer or employers who have failed to keep or furnish the required records or reports.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 308.)
-------------------------------------------

1094.

(a) Except as otherwise specifically provided in this code, the information obtained in the administration of this code is confidential, not open to the public, and shall be for the exclusive use and information of the director in discharge of his or her duties.

(b) The information released to authorized entities pursuant to other provisions of the code shall not be admissible in evidence in any action or special proceeding, other than one arising out of the provisions of this
 code or one described in Section 1095.

(c) The information may be tabulated and published in statistical form for use by federal, state, and local governmental departments and agencies, and the public, except that the name of the employing unit or of any worker shall never be divulged in the course of the tabulation or publication.

(d) Wages as defined by Section 13009 and amounts required to be deducted and withheld under Section 13020 shall not be disclosed except as provided in Article 2 (commencing with Section 19542) of Chapter 7 of Part 10.2 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(e) Any employee or his or her representative may receive his or her wage information upon written request by the employee. The information shall be provided without charge.

(f) Any person who knowingly accesses, uses, or discloses any confidential information without authorization is in violation of this section and is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 766, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

1095.

The director shall permit the use of any information in the director’s possession to the extent necessary for any of the following purposes, and may require reimbursement for all direct costs incurred in providing any and all information specified in this section, except information specified in subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive:

(a) To enable the director or the director’s representative to carry out their responsibilities under this code.

(b) To properly present a claim for benefits.

(c) To acquaint a worker or their authorized agent with the worker’s existing or prospective right to benefits.

(d) To furnish an employer or their authorized agent with information to enable the employer to fully discharge their obligations or safeguard their rights under this division or Division 3 (commencing with Section 9000).

(e) To enable an employer to receive a reduction in contribution rate.

(f) To enable federal, state, or local governmental departments or agencies, subject to federal law, to verify or determine the eligibility or entitlement of an applicant for, or a recipient of, public social services provided pursuant to Division 9 (commencing with Section 10000) of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or Part A of Subchapter IV of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 601 et seq.), and state or federal subsidies offered through the California Health Benefit Exchange provided pursuant to Title 22 (commencing with Section 100500) of the Government Code,
 when the verification or determination is directly connected with, and limited to, the administration of public social services.

(g) To enable county administrators of general relief or assistance, or their representatives, to determine entitlement to locally provided general relief or assistance, when the determination is directly connected with, and limited to, the administration of general relief or assistance.

(h) To enable state or local governmental departments or agencies to seek criminal, civil, or administrative remedies in connection with the unlawful application for, or receipt of, relief provided under Division 9 (commencing with Section 10000) of the Welfare and Institutions Code or to enable the collection of expenditures for medical assistance services pursuant to Part 5 (commencing with Section 17000) of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(i) To provide any law enforcement agency with the name, address, telephone number, birth date, social security number, physical description, and names and addresses of present and past employers, of any victim, suspect, missing person, potential witness, or person for whom a felony arrest warrant has been issued, when a request for this information is made by any investigator or peace officer as defined by Sections 830.1 and 830.2 of the Penal Code, or by any federal law enforcement officer to whom the Attorney General has delegated authority to enforce federal search warrants, as defined under Sections 60.2 and 60.3 of Title 28 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as amended, and when the requesting officer has been designated by the head of the law enforcement agency and requests this information in the course of and as a part of an investigation into the commission of a crime when there is a reasonable suspicion that the crime is a felony and
 that the information would lead to relevant evidence. The information provided pursuant to this subdivision shall be provided to the extent permitted by federal law and regulations, and to the extent the information is available and accessible within the constraints and configurations of existing department records. Any person who receives any information under this subdivision shall make a written report of the information to the law enforcement agency that employs the person, for filing under the normal procedures of that agency.

(1) This subdivision shall not be construed to authorize the release to any law enforcement agency of a general list identifying individuals applying for or receiving benefits.

(2) The department shall maintain records pursuant to this subdivision only for periods required under regulations or statutes enacted for the administration of its programs.

(3) This subdivision shall not be construed as limiting the information provided to law enforcement agencies to that pertaining only to applicants for, or recipients of, benefits.

(4) The department shall notify all applicants for benefits that release of confidential information from their records will not be protected should there be a felony arrest warrant issued against the applicant or in the event of an investigation by a law enforcement agency into the commission of a felony.

(j) To provide public employee retirement systems in California with information relating to the earnings of any person who has applied for or is receiving a disability income, disability allowance, or disability retirement allowance, from a public employee retirement system. The earnings information shall be released only upon written
 request from the governing board specifying that the person has applied for or is receiving a disability allowance or disability retirement allowance from its retirement system. The request may be made by the chief executive officer of the system or by an employee of the system so authorized and identified by name and title by the chief executive officer in writing.

(k) To enable the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement in the Department of Industrial Relations to seek criminal, civil, or administrative remedies in connection with the failure to pay, or the unlawful payment of, wages pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 200) of Part 1 of Division 2 of, and Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1720) of Part 7 of Division 2 of, the Labor Code.

(l) To enable federal, state, or local governmental departments or agencies to administer child support enforcement
 programs under Part D of Title IV of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 651 et seq.).

(m) To provide federal, state, or local governmental departments or agencies with wage and claim information in its possession that will assist those departments and agencies in the administration of the Victims of Crime Program or in the location of victims of crime who, by state mandate or court order, are entitled to restitution that has been or can be recovered.

(n) To provide federal, state, or local governmental departments or agencies with information concerning any individuals who are or have been:

(1) Directed by state mandate or court order to pay restitution, fines, penalties, assessments, or fees as a result of a violation of law.

(2) Delinquent or in default on guaranteed student loans or who owe repayment of funds received through other financial assistance programs administered by those agencies. The information released by the director for the purposes of this paragraph shall not include unemployment insurance benefit information.

(o) To provide an authorized governmental agency with any and all relevant information that relates to any specific workers’ compensation insurance fraud investigation. The information shall be provided to the extent permitted by federal law and regulations. For purposes of this subdivision, “authorized governmental agency” means the district attorney of any county, the office of the Attorney General, the Contractors State License Board, the Department of Industrial Relations, and the Department of Insurance. An authorized governmental agency may disclose this information to the State Bar of California, the Medical Board of
 California, or any other licensing board or department whose licensee is the subject of a workers’ compensation insurance fraud investigation. This subdivision shall not prevent any authorized governmental agency from reporting to any board or department the suspected misconduct of any licensee of that body.

(p) To enable the Director of Consumer Affairs, or the director’s representative, to access unemployment insurance quarterly wage data on a case-by-case basis to verify information on school administrators, school staff, and students provided by those schools who are being investigated for possible violations of Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 94800) of Part 59 of Division 10 of Title 3 of the Education Code.

(q) To provide employment tax information to the tax officials of Mexico, if a reciprocal agreement exists. For purposes of this subdivision, “reciprocal agreement”
 means a formal agreement to exchange information between national taxing officials of Mexico and taxing authorities of the State Board of Equalization, the Franchise Tax Board, and the Employment Development Department. Furthermore, the reciprocal agreement shall be limited to the exchange of information that is essential for tax administration purposes only. Taxing authorities of the State of California shall be granted tax information only on California residents. Taxing authorities of Mexico shall be granted tax information only on Mexican nationals.

(r) To enable city and county planning agencies to develop economic forecasts for planning purposes. The information shall be limited to businesses within the jurisdiction of the city or county whose planning agency is requesting the information, and shall not include information regarding individual employees.

(s) To provide the
 State Department of Developmental Services with wage and employer information that will assist in the collection of moneys owed by the recipient, parent, or any other legally liable individual for services and supports provided pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 4775) of Division 4.5 of, and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 7200) and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 7500) of Division 7 of, the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(t) To provide the State Board of Equalization with employment tax information that will assist in the administration of tax programs. The information shall be limited to the exchange of employment tax information essential for tax administration purposes to the extent permitted by federal law and regulations.

(u) This section shall not be construed to authorize or permit the use of information obtained in the administration of this code by any
 private collection agency.

(v) The disclosure of the name and address of an individual or business entity that was issued an assessment that included penalties under Section 1128 or 1128.1 shall not be in violation of Section 1094 if the assessment is final. The disclosure may also include any of the following:

(1) The total amount of the assessment.

(2) The amount of the penalty imposed under Section 1128 or 1128.1 that is included in the assessment.

(3) The facts that resulted in the charging of the penalty under Section 1128 or 1128.1.

(w) To enable the Contractors State License Board to verify the employment history of an individual applying for licensure pursuant to Section 7068 of
 the Business and Professions Code.

(x) To provide any peace officer with the Division of Investigation in the Department of Consumer Affairs information pursuant to subdivision (i) when the requesting peace officer has been designated by the Chief of the Division of Investigation and requests this information in the course of and as part of an investigation into the commission of a crime or other unlawful act when there is reasonable suspicion to believe that the crime or act may be connected to the information requested and would lead to relevant information regarding the crime or unlawful act.

(y) To enable the Labor Commissioner of the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement in the Department of Industrial Relations to identify, pursuant to Section 90.3 of the Labor Code, unlawfully uninsured employers. The information shall be provided to the extent permitted by federal law
 and regulations.

(z) To enable the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, in accordance with the requirements of Section 84754.5 of the Education Code, to obtain quarterly wage data, commencing January 1, 1993, on students who have attended one or more community colleges, to assess the impact of education on the employment and earnings of students, to conduct the annual evaluation of district-level and individual college performance in achieving priority educational outcomes, and to submit the required reports to the Legislature and the Governor. The information shall be provided to the extent permitted by federal statutes and regulations.

(aa) To enable the Public Employees’ Retirement System to seek criminal, civil, or administrative remedies in connection with the unlawful application for, or receipt of, benefits provided under Part 3 (commencing with Section 20000)
 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(ab) To enable the State Department of Education, the University of California, the California State University, and the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, pursuant to the requirements prescribed by the federal American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (Public Law 111-5), to obtain quarterly wage data, commencing July 1, 2010, on students who have attended their respective systems to assess the impact of education on the employment and earnings of those students, to conduct the annual analysis of district-level and individual district or postsecondary education system performance in achieving priority educational outcomes, and to submit the required reports to the Legislature and the Governor. The information shall be provided to the extent permitted by federal statutes and regulations.

(ac) To provide the
 Agricultural Labor Relations Board with employee, wage, and employer information, for use in the investigation or enforcement of the Alatorre-Zenovich-Dunlap-Berman Agricultural Labor Relations Act of 1975 (Part 3.5 (commencing with Section 1140) of Division 2 of the Labor Code). The information shall be provided to the extent permitted by federal statutes and regulations.

(ad) (1) To enable the State Department of Health Care Services, the California Health Benefit Exchange, the Managed Risk Medical Insurance Board, and county departments and agencies to obtain information regarding employee wages, California employer names and account numbers, employer reports of wages and number of employees, and disability insurance and unemployment insurance claim information, for the purpose of:

(A) Verifying or determining the eligibility of an applicant for, or a